Washington statutes.
RCW 43.101.350

Core training requirements.

(1) All law enforcement personnel initially hired to, transferred to, or promoted to a supervisory or management position on or after January 1, 1999, and all corrections personnel of the state and all counties and municipal corporations transferred or promoted to a supervisory or management position on or after January 1, 1982, shall, within the first six months of entry into the position, successfully complete the core training requirements prescribed by rule of the commission for the position, or obtain a waiver or extension of the core training requirements from the commission.

(2) Within one year after completion of the core training requirements of this section, all law enforcement personnel and corrections personnel shall successfully complete all remaining requirements for career level certification prescribed by rule of the commission applicable to their position or rank, or obtain a waiver or extension of the career level training requirements from the commission.

(3) The commission shall provide the training required in this section, together with facilities, supplies, materials, and the room and board for attendees who do not live within fifty miles of the training center. The training shall be delivered in the least disruptive manner to local law enforcement or corrections agencies, and will include but not be limited to regional on-site training, interactive training, and credit for training given by the home department.

(4) Nothing in this section affects or impairs the employment status of an employee whose employer does not provide the opportunity to engage in the required training.

[ 2007 c 382 s 2; 1997 c 351 s 10.]

NOTES:

Severability—Effective date—1997 c 351: See notes following RCW 43.101.200.